Idaho, session 2025, H0480.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $533,900 $533,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund 0 $673,900 673,900
TOTAL $533,900 $673,900 $1,207,800


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $261,400 $261,400
III. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $5,300 $5,300
B. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $1,226,200 $1,506,900 $2,733,100
DIVISION TOTAL $1,226,200 $1,506,900 $5,300 $2,738,400
GRAND TOTAL $1,760,100 $1,768,300 $679,200 $4,207,600
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare is hereby
reduced by the following amounts for the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. SUBSTANCE ABUSE TREATMENT & PREVENTION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $533,900 $533,900
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $673,900 0 673,900
TOTAL $673,900 $533,900 $1,207,800


FOR
FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL BENEFIT
COSTS PAYMENTS TOTAL
II. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $5,300 $5,300
B. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $2,733,100 $2,733,100
DIVISION TOTAL $2,733,100 $5,300 $2,738,400
GRAND TOTAL $3,407,000 $539,200 $3,946,200
SECTION 3. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other authorization
provided by law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position autho-
rization provided to the Department of Health and Welfare for the Mental
Health Services Division is hereby reduced by nine (9.00) for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 4. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the divisions of Mental Health Services
and Psychiatric Hospitalization may transfer personnel costs and trustee
and benefit payments pursuant to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. PROGRAM RESTRICTIONS REGARDING RACE OR GENDER. The Depart-
ment of Health and Welfare's Division of Behavioral Health shall ensure no
appropriated funds are used for training or programming that advances diver-
sity, equity, and inclusion; critical race theory; or transgender ideology;
or for other programs that distribute or restrict funding based on compos-
able criteria of race or gender.
SECTION 6. CHILD AND ADOLESCENT ASSESSMENT ALTERNATIVES REPORT. The
Department of Health and Welfare shall provide a report exploring alterna-
tives to the Child and Adolescent Needs and Strengths assessment, as well
as opportunities for parents, providers, and patients to opt out of certain
questions. No assessment alternative considered in the report shall include
assessing sexual orientation and gender identity and expression. The report
shall be submitted to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee and the


Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Services Office no
later than January 15, 2026.
SECTION 7. FEDERAL FUNDING RESTRICTIONS. Pursuant to Section
67-3511(2), Idaho Code, legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
Appropriations made pursuant to this act contingent on anticipated federal
funding, grants, or programs shall not be supplanted by state funds in the
event of any reduction or elimination of such federal support without leg-
islative approval. The agency receiving the appropriation shall take all
necessary actions to ensure that the state is not obligated to replace lost
federal funds. Pursuant to Section 67-1917, Idaho Code, the agency will
submit an inventory of federal funds utilized by the agency. State funds ap-
propriated to satisfy match requirements for federal funds shall be reverted
to the maximum extent possible if federal funds requiring match are reduced
or eliminated. The agency shall promptly notify the Budget and Policy Anal-
ysis Division of the Legislative Services Office of any significant changes
related to federal funding, grants, or programs. This does not apply to
standard federal funding adjustments that take place within an agency's cost
allocation plan or indirect expenditure plan for indirect costs and agency
support staff, FMAP adjustments, or entitlement programs.
SECTION 8. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 9. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 313, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Department of Health and Welfare the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025:
FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
I. MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES:
ADULT MENTAL HEALTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Federal)
Fund $5,987,200 $756,600 $6,743,800
II. PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALIZATION:
A. COMMUNITY HOSPITALIZATION:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $2,663,500 $2,663,500


FOR
FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. STATE HOSPITAL SOUTH:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (General)
Fund $1,000,000 $1,000,000
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund 3,859,700 3,859,700
TOTAL $4,859,700 $4,859,700
C. STATE HOSPITAL WEST:
FROM:
Cooperative Welfare (Dedicated)
Fund $700,000 $1,506,900 $2,206,900
DIVISION TOTAL $5,559,700 $1,506,900 $2,663,500 $9,730,100
GRAND TOTAL $5,559,700 $7,494,100 $3,420,100 $16,473,900
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to the Department of Health and Welfare in Section 1,
Chapter 313, Laws of 2024, is hereby reduced by the following amounts, ac-
cording to the designated programs for personnel costs from the Cooperative
Welfare (Federal) Fund for the division of Psychiatric Hospitalization for
the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025:
State Hospital South $4,859,700
State Hospital West 2,206,900
TOTAL $7,066,600
SECTION 11. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Mental Health Services may
transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant to Sec-
tion 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 12. TRANSFER LIMITATION EXEMPTION. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of law to the contrary, the division of Psychiatric Hospitaliza-
tion may transfer personnel costs and trustee and benefit payments pursuant
to Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, for the period July 1, 2024, through June 30,
2025.
SECTION 13. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 9 through 12 of this act shall be in full force


and effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 8 of this
act shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.